Indiana, session 2026, HB1416.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 34-13-3-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 182, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in
IC 36-1-3.3-4, a governmental entity or an employee acting within the
scope of the employee's employment is not liable if a loss results from
the following:
(1) The natural condition of unimproved property.
(2) The condition of a reservoir, dam, canal, conduit, drain, or
similar structure when used by a person for a purpose that is not
foreseeable.
(3) The temporary condition of a public thoroughfare or extreme
sport area that results from weather.
(4) The condition of an unpaved road, trail, or footpath, the
purpose of which is to provide access to a recreation or scenic
area.
(5) The design, construction, control, operation, or normal
condition of an extreme sport area, if all entrances to the extreme
2026 IN 1416—LS 6235/DI 116


sport area are marked with:
(A) a set of rules governing the use of the extreme sport area;
(B) a warning concerning the hazards and dangers associated
with the use of the extreme sport area; and
(C) a statement that the extreme sport area may be used only
by persons operating extreme sport equipment.
This subdivision shall not be construed to relieve a governmental
entity from liability for the continuing duty to maintain extreme
sports areas in a reasonably safe condition.
(6) The initiation of a judicial or an administrative proceeding.
(7) The performance of a discretionary function; however, the
provision of medical or optical care as provided in IC 34-6-2.1-54
shall be considered as a ministerial act.
(8) The adoption and enforcement of or failure to adopt or
enforce:
(A) a law (including rules and regulations); or
(B) in the case of a public school or charter school, a policy;
unless the act of enforcement constitutes false arrest or false
imprisonment.
(9) An act or omission performed in good faith and without
malice under the apparent authority of a statute which is invalid
if the employee would not have been liable had the statute been
valid.
(10) The act or omission of anyone other than the governmental
entity or the governmental entity's employee.
(11) The issuance, denial, suspension, or revocation of, or failure
or refusal to issue, deny, suspend, or revoke any permit, license,
certificate, approval, order, or similar authorization, where the
authority is discretionary under the law.
(12) Failure to make an inspection, or making an inadequate or
negligent inspection, of any property, other than the property of
a governmental entity, to determine whether the property
complied with or violates any law or contains a hazard to health
or safety.
(13) Entry upon any property where the entry is expressly or
impliedly authorized by law.
(14) Misrepresentation if unintentional.
(15) Theft by another person of money in the employee's official
custody, unless the loss was sustained because of the employee's
own negligent or wrongful act or omission.
(16) Injury to the property of a person under the jurisdiction and
control of the department of correction if the person has not
2026 IN 1416—LS 6235/DI 116


exhausted the administrative remedies and procedures provided
by section 7 of this chapter.
(17) Injury to the person or property of a person under supervision
of a governmental entity and who is:
(A) on probation;
(B) assigned to an alcohol and drug services program under
IC 12-23, a minimum security release program under
IC 11-10-8, a pretrial conditional release program under
IC 35-33-8, or a community corrections program under
IC 11-12; or
(C) subject to a court order requiring the person to be escorted
by a county police officer while on or in a government
building (as defined in IC 36-9-13-3) owned by a county
building authority under IC 36-9-13, unless the injury is the
result of an act or omission amounting to:
(i) gross negligence;
(ii) willful or wanton misconduct; or
(iii) intentional misconduct.
(18) Design of a highway (as defined in IC 9-13-2-73), toll road
project (as defined in IC 8-15-2-4(4)), tollway (as defined in
IC 8-15-3-7), or project (as defined in IC 8-15.7-2-14) if the
claimed loss occurs at least twenty (20) years after the public
highway, toll road project, tollway, or project was designed or
substantially redesigned; except that this subdivision shall not be
construed to relieve a responsible governmental entity from the
continuing duty to provide and maintain public highways in a
reasonably safe condition.
(19) Development, adoption, implementation, operation,
maintenance, or use of an enhanced emergency communication
system.
(20) Injury to a student or a student's property by an employee of
a school corporation if the employee is acting reasonably under a:
(A) discipline policy adopted under IC 20-33-8-12; or
(B) restraint and seclusion plan adopted under IC 20-20-40-14.
(21) An act or omission performed in good faith under the
apparent authority of a court order described in IC 35-46-1-15.1
or IC 35-46-1-15.3 that is invalid, including an arrest or
imprisonment related to the enforcement of the court order, if the
governmental entity or employee would not have been liable had
the court order been valid.
(22) An act taken to investigate or remediate hazardous
substances, petroleum, or other pollutants associated with a
2026 IN 1416—LS 6235/DI 116


brownfield (as defined in IC 13-11-2-19.3) unless:
(A) the loss is a result of reckless conduct; or
(B) the governmental entity was responsible for the initial
placement of the hazardous substances, petroleum, or other
pollutants on the brownfield.
(23) The operation of an off-road vehicle (as defined in
IC 14-8-2-185) by a nongovernmental employee, or by a
governmental employee not acting within the scope of the
employment of the employee, on a public highway in a county
road system outside the corporate limits of a city or town, unless
the loss is the result of an act or omission amounting to:
(A) gross negligence;
(B) willful or wanton misconduct; or
(C) intentional misconduct.
This subdivision shall not be construed to relieve a governmental
entity from liability for the continuing duty to maintain highways
in a reasonably safe condition for the operation of motor vehicles
licensed by the bureau of motor vehicles for operation on public
highways.
(24) Any act or omission rendered in connection with a request,
investigation, assessment, or opinion provided under
IC 36-9-28.7.
(b) This subsection applies to a cause of action that accrues during
a period of a state disaster emergency declared under IC 10-14-3-12 to
respond to COVID-19, if the state of disaster emergency was declared
after February 29, 2020, and before April 1, 2022. A governmental
entity or an employee acting within the scope of the employee's
employment is not liable for an act or omission arising from COVID-19
unless the act or omission constitutes gross negligence, willful or
wanton misconduct, or intentional misrepresentation. If a claim
described in this subsection is:
(1) a claim for injury or death resulting from medical malpractice;
and
(2) not barred by the immunity provided under this subsection;
the claimant is required to comply with all of the provisions of
IC 34-18 (medical malpractice act).
SECTION 2. IC 36-1-3-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The rule of law that any doubt
as to the existence of a power of a unit shall be resolved against its
existence is abrogated except as otherwise provided in IC 36-1-3.3.
(b) Except as provided in IC 36-1-3.3, any doubt as to the
existence of a power of a unit shall be resolved in favor of its existence.
2026 IN 1416—LS 6235/DI 116


This rule applies even though a statute granting the power has been
repealed.
SECTION 3. IC 36-1-3-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Except as otherwise
provided in IC 36-1-3.3, the rule of law that a unit has only:
(1) powers expressly granted by statute;
(2) powers necessarily or fairly implied in or incident to powers
expressly granted; and
(3) powers indispensable to the declared purposes of the unit;
is abrogated.
(b) A unit has:
(1) all powers granted it by statute; and
(2) except as provided in IC 36-1-3.3, all other powers necessary
or desirable in the conduct of its affairs, even though not granted
by statute.
(c) The powers that units have under subsection (b)(1) are listed in
various statutes. However, these statutes do not list the powers that
units have under subsection (b)(2); therefore, the omission of a power
from such a list does not imply that units lack that power.
SECTION 4. IC 36-1-3-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in
IC 36-1-3.3 and subsection (b), a unit may exercise any power it has
to the extent that the power:
(1) is not expressly denied by the Indiana Constitution or by
statute; and
(2) is not expressly granted to another entity.
(b) A township may not exercise power the township has if another
unit in which all or part of the township is located exercises that same
power.
SECTION 5. IC 36-1-3-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.4-2023,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Subject to subsection (b), a unit does not
have the following:
(1) The power to condition or limit its civil liability, except as
expressly granted by statute.
(2) The power to prescribe the law governing civil actions
between private persons.
(3) The power to impose duties on another political subdivision,
except as expressly granted by statute.
(4) The power to impose a tax, except as expressly granted by
statute.
(5) The power to impose a license fee greater than that reasonably
2026 IN 1416—LS 6235/DI 116


related to the administrative cost of exercising a regulatory power.
(6) The power to impose a service charge or user fee greater than
that reasonably related to reasonable and just rates and charges
for services.
(7) The power to regulate conduct that is regulated by a state
agency, except as expressly granted by statute.
(8) The power to prescribe a penalty for conduct constituting a
crime or infraction under statute.
(9) The power to prescribe a penalty of imprisonment for an
ordinance violation.
(10) The power to prescribe a penalty of a fine as follows:
(A) More than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for the violation
of an ordinance or a regulation concerning air emissions
adopted by a county that has received approval to establish an
air permit program under IC 13-17-12-6.
(B) For a violation of any other ordinance:
(i) more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for
a first violation of the ordinance; and
(ii) except as provided in subsection (c), more than seven
thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) for a second or
subsequent violation of the ordinance.
(11) The power to invest money, except as expressly granted by
statute.
(12) The power to adopt an ordinance, a resolution, or an order
concerning an election described by IC 3-5-1-2, or otherwise
conduct an election, except as expressly granted by statute. An
ordinance, a resolution, or an order concerning an election
described by IC 3-5-1-2 that was adopted before January 1, 2023,
is void unless a statute expressly granted the unit the power to
adopt the ordinance, resolution, or order.
(13) The power to adopt or enforce an ordinance described in
section 8.5 of this chapter.
(14) The power to take any action prohibited by section 8.6 of this
chapter.
(15) The power to dissolve a political subdivision, except:
(A) as expressly granted by statute; or
(B) if IC 36-1-8-17.7 applies to the political subdivision, in
accordance with the procedure set forth in IC 36-1-8-17.7.
(16) After June 30, 2019, the power to enact an ordinance
requiring a solid waste hauler or a person who operates a vehicle
in which recyclable material is transported for recycling to collect
fees authorized by IC 13-21 and remit the fees to:
2026 IN 1416—LS 6235/DI 116


(A) a unit; or
(B) the board of a solid waste management district established
under IC 13-21.
(17) Powers preempted under IC 36-1-3.3.
(b) A township does not have the following, except as expressly
granted by statute:
(1) The power to require a license or impose a license fee.
(2) The power to impose a service charge or user fee.
(3) The power to prescribe a penalty.
(c) Subsection (a)(10)(B)(ii) does not apply to the violation of an
ordinance that regulates traffic or parking.
SECTION 6. IC 36-1-3.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 3.3. Regulatory Consistency Preemption of Local
Ordinances, Orders, and Rules
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to a:
(1) county; and
(2) municipality.
Sec. 2. Unless expressly authorized by another statute, a
municipality or county may not adopt, enforce, or maintain an
ordinance, order, or rule regulating conduct in a field of regulation
that is occupied by a provision in the following titles:
(1) IC 14 (Natural and Cultural Resources);
(2) IC 15 (Agriculture and Animals);
(3) IC 22 (Labor and Safety);
(4) IC 23 (Business and Other Associations);
(5) IC 24 (Trade Regulation);
(6) IC 25 (Professions and Occupations);
(7) IC 27 (Insurance);
(8) IC 28 (Financial Institutions); or
(9) IC 32 (Property).
An ordinance, order, or rule adopted by a county or municipality
that violates this section is void, unenforceable, and inconsistent
with this chapter.
Sec. 3. This chapter:
(1) may not be construed to prohibit a municipality or county
from building or maintaining a road, imposing a tax, or
carrying out any authority expressly authorized by statute;
(2) does not affect the authority of a municipality or county to
adopt, enforce, or maintain an ordinance or rule that relates
to the control, care, management, welfare, or health and
2026 IN 1416—LS 6235/DI 116


safety of animals;
(3) does not affect the authority of a municipality or county to
conduct a public awareness campaign;
(4) does not affect the authority of a municipality or county
to:
(A) enter into or negotiate terms of a collective bargaining
agreement with its employees; or
(B) adopt a policy related to its employees; and
(5) does not affect the authority of a municipality or county to
repeal or amend an existing ordinance, order, or rule that
violates the provisions of this chapter for the limited purpose
of bringing that ordinance, order, or rule in compliance with
this chapter.
Sec. 4. (a) A person (as defined in IC 4-30-2-6) who has
sustained an injury in fact, actual or threatened, from a municipal
or county ordinance, order, or rule adopted or enforced by a
municipality or county in violation of this chapter, or a trade
association representing the person, has standing to bring and may
bring an action against the municipality or county.
(b) A person is entitled to recover in an action brought under
this chapter:
(1) declaratory and injunctive relief; and
(2) costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
(c) A municipality or county is entitled to recover in an action
brought under this chapter costs and reasonable attorney's fees if
the court finds the action to be frivolous.
(d) A governmental entity may not claim immunity under
IC 34-13-3-3.
(e) A municipality or county is entitled to receive notice of an
action under this chapter in accordance with IC 34-13-3-8.
2026 IN 1416—LS 6235/DI 116